North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-12.5 Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Licensure Compact
By majority vote of all administrators, the commission shall take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.

11.

Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing. However, the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this section must be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:

a.

Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;

b.

Prevent a loss of commission or party state funds; or

c.

Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule.

12.

The commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions must be posted on the website of the commission. The revision may be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge must be made in writing, and delivered to the commission, before the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission.

ARTICLE IX — OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT

1.

Oversight.

a.

Each party state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact’s purposes and intent.

b.

The commission is entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the commission, and has standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the commission renders a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.

2.

Default, technical assistance, and termination.

a.

If the commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall:

b.

If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state’s membership in this compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.

c.

Termination of membership in this compact must be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate must be given by the commission to the governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state’s licensing board, the defaulting state’s licensing board, and each of the party states.

d.

A state whose membership in this compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.

e.

The commission may not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this compact has been terminated, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state.

f.

The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party must be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.

3.

Dispute resolution.

a.

Upon request by a party state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states.

b.

The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.

c.

If the commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this compact:

(1)

The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute.

(2)

The decision of a majority of the arbitrators is final and binding.

4.

Enforcement.

a.

The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.

b.

By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. If judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party must be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.

c.

The remedies herein are not the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

ARTICLE X — EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT

1.

This compact comes into limited effect at such time as this compact has been enacted into law in seven party states for the sole purpose of establishing and convening the commission to adopt rules relating to its operation.

2.

Any state that joins this compact after the commission’s initial adoption of the advanced practice registered nurse uniform licensure requirements are subject to all rules that have been previously adopted by the commission.

3.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state’s withdrawal does not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute.

4.

A party state’s withdrawal or termination does not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring before the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.

5.

This compact may not be construed to invalidate or prevent any advanced practice registered nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.

6.

This compact may be amended by the party states. An amendment to this compact does not become effective and binding upon any party state until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

7.

Representatives of nonparty states to this compact must be invited to participate in the activities of the commission, on a nonvoting basis, before the adoption of this compact by all states.

ARTICLE XI — CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This compact must be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes of this compact. The provisions of this compact are severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is not affected thereby. If this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this compact remains in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.